California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Delta Tributary Watershed Program [78647. - 78647.16.]

78647.

(a) (1) There is hereby created in the account the Delta Tributary Watershed Subaccount.

(2) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Delta Tributary Watershed Subaccount created by paragraph (1).

(3) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the board for grants for eligible projects in accordance with this article, and for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.2.

(a) The board shall administer a program under which a county, or a joint powers authority in which a county is a participant, may submit an application to the board for an eligible project requesting financial or technical assistance for the purpose of developing a voluntary, incentive-based watershed rehabilitation project. The board shall consult with other federal and state resource agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Fish and Game and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, in the administration of the program. The Resources Agency shall make a written recommendation to the board regarding each application. The board shall consider the recommendations of the Resources Agency and include, when appropriate, the recommendation in the board’s final decision.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a county, or a joint powers authority in which a county is a participant, after a request to do so by a local public agency, declines to submit an application for an eligible project for a watershed that is all or in part within the boundaries of the county, a local public agency other than the county or that joint powers agency may submit an application in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.4.

(a) “Eligible project” means a watershed rehabilitation project undertaken on lands owned or operated by the federal, state, or a local government, or a private person or entity within the delta tributary watershed.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “delta tributary watershed” means a watershed which drains into the delta or the Trinity River.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.5.

An eligible project shall include one or more of the following purposes:

(a) A reduction in the presence of contaminants in drinking water by addressing the origins of the contaminants, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the specific activities that affect the drinking water supply of a community or communities. A project with a purpose described in this subdivision shall address contaminants, including those that are pathogenic organisms, for which a national primary drinking water regulation has been established, and that are detected in the community water system for which the application is submitted at levels above the maximum contaminant level or that are detected by adequate monitoring methods at levels that are not reliably and consistently below the maximum contaminant level.

(b) An increase in the yield of water available from, and water retention capabilities of, the watershed, including projects to reduce dense forest understory, restore upland meadows, and repair stream channels.

(c) The improvement, restoration, or enhancement of fisheries habitat, including riparian habitat, in and along streams and watercourses in the watershed. Projects may address factors which increase sedimentation in streams and watercourses in the watershed.

(d) The improvement of overall forest health, including the reduction of factors which may contribute to the severity of wildfires in the watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.6.

(a) Every project funded under this article shall comply with state and federal law, regulations, and policies, and shall not degrade the quality of any waters of the state.

(b) An application submitted to the board under this article shall include all of the following information:

(1) An identification of any deficiencies in information that may impair the development or implementation of a project.

(2) A discussion of the efforts undertaken to implement the project and to obtain the participation of both of the following:

(A) Public agencies with relevant responsibilities in the watershed.

(B) Persons and entities in the watershed who may be affected by recommendations of the project and whose participation is essential to the success of the project.

(3) Evidence in the form of a statement from a private person or entity that that person or entity consents to the inclusion of private property in the project, as appropriate.

(4) A monitoring plan to determine whether project purposes are satisfied.

(5) An outline of the way in which project participants will, during the development and implementation of the project, identify and take into account any activities being undertaken by persons or entities in the watershed under federal or state law to rehabilitate the watershed. A project shall include voluntary and incentive-based strategies for the long-term rehabilitation of the watershed.

(6) An identification of the technical, financial, or other assistance that the applicant will request to develop or implement the project.

(7) When feasible, an identification of quantifiable, innovative, and cost-effective methods for achieving project purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.7.

An application submitted to the board under Section 78647.6 shall also include the following information:

(a) A delineation of the watershed area or areas critical for project purposes using available hydrogeologic or other pertinent information. If no information is available, the project shall conduct, to the extent practicable, vulnerability assessments in the watershed area, including identification of risks to drinking water, a project may use delineations and vulnerability assessments undertaken to identify groundwater sources under a wellhead protection program, surface or groundwater sources under a pesticide management plan, or surface water sources under a state or local watershed initiative, or undertaken in accordance with Subpart H (commencing with Section 141.70) of Part 141 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) An identification, to the maximum extent practicable, of the origins of drinking water contaminants that may be addressed by a project, including, to the maximum extent practicable, a description of the specific activities contributing to the presence of the contaminants in the watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.8.

The board may approve a grant for an eligible project to develop or implement a project, not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per project. A grant shall not exceed 50 percent of the administrative costs incurred, or estimated to be incurred, by the applicant in connection with carrying out the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.10.

(a) After providing notice and an opportunity for public comment with regard to an application submitted under Section 78647.6, the board shall approve or disapprove the application, in whole or in part, not later than 120 days after the date of submission of the application. The board shall prepare, and transmit to the Resources Agency and the applicant, written findings with regard to the recommendations of the Resources Agency.

(b) The board may approve an application if the application meets the requirements established under this article. The notice of approval shall include all of the following:

(1) The identification of technical, financial, or other assistance that the board agrees to provide to assist in the development or implementation of a project.

(2) Any necessary coordination that the board will perform.

(3) A description of any funds available for the purpose of developing and implementing the project, including any funds in a water pollution control revolving fund established in connection with Subchapter VI (commencing with Section 1381) of the Clean Water Act.

(4) A description of other technical or financial assistance that is available under state or federal law for the purpose of developing or implementing the project.

(5) A description of activities that are undertaken, or will be undertaken, to coordinate federal and state programs which are relevant to the watershed that is the subject of the application.

(c) If the board disapproves an application submitted under Section 78647.6, the board shall notify the entity submitting the application in writing of the reasons for disapproval. An application may be resubmitted under either of the following circumstances:

(1) New information becomes available.

(2) Conditions affecting the watershed that is the subject of the application change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.12.

The board may adopt regulations to implement this article. The regulations shall include all of the following:

(a) Criteria for the assessment of watershed areas.

(b) Procedures for the submission of applications.

(c) Procedures for the approval or disapproval of an application submitted under Section 78647.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.14.

Grant recipients shall submit a report on completion of the project to the board indicating whether the purposes of the project have been met. The board shall make the report available to interested federal, state, and local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.16.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Seawater Intrusion Control [78648. - 78648.16.]

78648.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) (1) “Eligible seawater intrusion control project” means a project which is all of the following:

(A) Necessary to protect groundwater that is (i) within a basin that is subject to a local groundwater management plan for which a review is completed pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) and (ii) is threatened by seawater intrusion in an area where restrictions on groundwater pumping, a physical solution, or both, are necessary to prevent the destruction of, or irreparable injury to, groundwater quality.

(B) Is cost-effective. In the case of a project to provide a substitute water supply, the project shall be cost-effective as compared to the development of other new sources of water and shall include requirements or measures adequate to ensure that the substitute supply will be used in lieu of previously established extractions or diversions of groundwater.

(C) Complies with applicable water quality standards, policies, and plans.

(2) Eligible projects may include, but are not limited to, water conservation, freshwater well injection, and substitution of groundwater pumping from local surface supplies.

(b) “Local agency” means any city, county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved in water management.

(c) “Subaccount” means the Seawater Intrusion Control Subaccount created by Section 78648.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.2.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Seawater Intrusion Control Subaccount. The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 11340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the board for loans to local agencies to carry out eligible seawater intrusion control projects and for the purposes described in this article, and for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.4.

The board may enter into contracts to make loans to local agencies for the purposes set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.6.

Any contract for a loan entered into pursuant to Section 78648.4 may include those provisions determined by the board to be necessary for purposes of this article and shall include both of the following provisions:

(a) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible seawater intrusion control project.

(b) An agreement by the local agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible seawater intrusion control project, commence operation of the project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, and provide for the payment of the local agency’s share of the cost of the project, including the principal of, and interest on, the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.8.

(a) A contract for a loan may not provide for a moratorium on the payment of the principal of, or interest on, the loan.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to Section 78648.4 shall be for a period not to exceed 20 years.

(c) The board may enter into a contract for a loan up to 100 percent of the total eligible cost of design and construction of an eligible seawater intrusion control project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.10.

(a) The board shall establish the interest rate for a loan made pursuant to this article at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method.

(b) If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent.

(c)The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.12.

Unallocated funds remaining in the subaccount on March 8, 2000, and any funds deposited into the subaccount after that date, shall be transferred to, and all money repaid to the state pursuant to any loan contract executed under this article shall be deposited in, the Seawater Intrusion Control Subaccount in the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund for the purposes set forth in Article 6 (commencing with Section 79149) of Chapter 7 of Division 26.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.14.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.16.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay for both of the following:

(a) To pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(b) For the purposes of Section 78648.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Lake Tahoe Water Quality [78650. - 78650.4.]

78650.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this article, “subaccount” means the Lake Tahoe Water Quality Subaccount created by Section 78650.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78650.2.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Lake Tahoe Water Quality Subaccount. The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the California Tahoe Conservancy for the purposes of directly undertaking, or for grants to public agencies for, land acquisition and improvement programs which control soil erosion, restore watersheds, or preserve environmentally sensitive lands and the natural environment, and related implementation costs, pursuant to Title 7.42 (commencing with Section 66905) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78650.4.

Any acquisition pursuant to this article shall be from willing sellers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Water Supply Reliability [78651. - 78682.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [78651. - 78652.]

78651.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this chapter, “account” means the Water Supply Reliability Account created by Section 78652.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78652.

The Water Supply Reliability Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of one hundred seventeen million dollars ($117,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Feasibility Projects [78655. - 78657.]

78655.

(a) (1) There is hereby created in the account the Feasibility Projects Subaccount.

(2) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Feasibility Projects Subaccount created by paragraph (1).

(b) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78656.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department, for the administration of this article and for feasibility and environmental investigations for any of the following projects:

(a) Off-stream storage upstream of the delta that will provide storage and flood control benefits in an environmentally sensitive and cost-effective manner.

(b) Regional water recycling that may include partnerships or other cooperative efforts undertaken by water agencies, wastewater dischargers, or other public agencies to collect and reuse treated municipal wastewater for agricultural, industrial, residential, and environmental purposes.

(c) Water transfer facilities in a county of the third class that would increase capacity for delivering Colorado River water for use in the southern California coastal plain and reduce demands on the bay-delta.

(d) Desalination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78657.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge [78670. - 78676.]

78670.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) (1) “Groundwater recharge facilities” means land and facilities for artificial groundwater recharge through methods which include, but are not limited to, percolation using basins, pits, ditches and furrows, modified streambed, flooding, and well injection and in-lieu recharge. “Groundwater recharge facilities” also means capital outlay expenditures to expand, renovate, or restructure land and facilities already in use for the purpose of groundwater recharge and to acquire additional land for retention and detention basins.

(2) Groundwater recharge facilities may include any of the following:

(A) Instream facilities for regulation of water levels, but not regulation of streamflow to accomplish diversion from the waterway.

(B) Agency-owned facilities for extraction.

(C) Conveyance facilities to the recharge site, including devices for flow regulation and measurement of recharge waters.

(3) Any part or all of the project facilities, including the land under the facilities, may consist of the separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features, of a larger system, or both.

(b) “In-lieu recharge” means accomplishing increased storage of groundwater by providing interruptible surface water to a user who relies on groundwater as a primary supply, to accomplish groundwater storage through the direct use of that surface water in lieu of pumping groundwater. In-lieu recharge is used instead of continuing pumping while artificially recharging with the interruptible surface waters. However, bond proceeds may not be used to purchase surface water for use in lieu of pumping groundwater.

(c) “Local agency” or “agency” means any city, county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved with water management.

(d) “Project” means both of the following:

(1) Groundwater recharge facilities.

(2) Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs.

(e) “Subaccount” means the Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Subaccount created by Section 78671.

(f) (1) “Voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs” mean those feasible capital outlay measures to improve the efficiency of water use through programs, the benefits of which exceed their costs.

(2) (A) The programs include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The lining or piping of ditches.

(ii) Improvements in water distribution system controls such as automated canal control, construction of small reservoirs within distribution systems that conserve water that has already been captured for use, and related physical improvements.

(iii) Tailwater pumpback recovery systems.

(iv) Major improvements or replacements of distribution systems to reduce leakage.

(v) Capital changes in on-farm irrigation systems which improve irrigation efficiency such as sprinkler or subsurface drip.

(vi) Capital outlay features of urban water conservation programs identified in the “Memorandum of Understanding Regarding Urban Water Conservation in California,” as amended on March 9, 1994.

(vii) Conveyance facilities in a county of the third class, including appurtenances, necessary to implement a long-term conservation program to transfer conserved water from areas not directly receiving water from the bay-delta to areas that receive water from the bay-delta and whose demands on the bay-delta would be reduced as a result of the transfer.

(B) In each case, the department shall determine if there is a net savings of water as a result of each proposed project and the project is cost-effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78671.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Subaccount. The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, for loans to local agencies to aid in the acquisition and construction of voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation programs and groundwater recharge facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78672.

Any loan contract entered into pursuant to this article may include provisions determined to be necessary by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78672.5.

(a) Any loan contract concerning an eligible, voluntary, cost-effective capital outlay water conservation program shall be supported by, or shall include, all of the following:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the program.

(2) An agreement by the local agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the program.

(3) A provision that there shall be no moratorium or deferment on payments of principal or interest.

(4) A loan period of not more than 20 years with an interest rate set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method. If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(5) A provision that the project shall not receive any more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the department.

(b) The department shall give preference for loans under this section on the basis of the cost-effectiveness of the proposed project, with the most cost-effective projects receiving the highest preference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78673.

(a) Any loan contract concerning an eligible project for groundwater recharge shall be supported by, or shall include, all of the following:

(1) A finding by the department that the agency has the ability to repay the requested loan, that the project is economically justified, and that the project is feasible from an engineering and hydrogeologic viewpoint.

(2) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the project, including a feasibility report which shall set forth the economic justification and the engineering, hydrogeologic, and financial feasibility of the project, and shall include explanations of the proposed facilities and their relation to other water-related facilities in the basin or region.

(3) An agreement by the agency to proceed expeditiously to complete the project in conformance with the approved plans and specifications and the feasibility report and to operate and maintain the project properly upon completion throughout the repayment period.

(4) A provision that there shall be no moratorium or deferment on payment of principal or interest.

(5) A loan period of not more than 20 years with an interest rate set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method. If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(6) A provision that the project shall not receive more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the department.

(b) The department shall give preference under this section to projects for groundwater recharge that are located in overdrafted groundwater basins and those projects of critical need, to projects whose feasibility studies show the greatest economic justification and the greatest engineering and hydrogeologic feasibility as determined by the department, and to projects located in areas which have existing water management programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78674.

The department may make loans to local agencies, at the interest rates authorized under this article and under any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the department, for the purposes of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for funding under this article. No single project shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 3 percent of the total amount of bonds authorized to be expended for purposes of this article may be expended for the purposes of financing feasibility studies. A loan for a feasibility study shall not decrease the maximum amount of any other loan which may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78675.

Unallocated funds remaining in the subaccount on March 8, 2000, shall be transferred to, and all money repaid to the state pursuant to any loan contract executed under this article shall be deposited in, the Water Conservation Account in the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund for the purposes of entering into additional loans under Article 3 (commencing with Section 79157) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 79161) of Chapter 8 of Division 26.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 10.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78675.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for a grant to a local agency for the development of supplemental water sources, distribution systems, and recharge facilities in a watershed that is in a state of overdraft and whose ability to locally finance the facilities has been adversely affected by the Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-510).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78676.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Projects [78680. - 78680.20.]

78680.

(a) (1) There is hereby created in the account the Local Projects Subaccount.

(2) For the purposes of this article “subaccount” means the Local Projects Subaccount created by paragraph (1).

(3) The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, for grants and loans in accordance with this article, and for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.2.

It is the intent of this article to finance a program to further the development, control, and conservation of the water resources of the state by assisting public agencies in the construction of eligible projects undertaken to meet local requirements in which there is a statewide interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.4.

The following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Feasibility study” means a report on the feasibility of a project, dam, or reservoir. A feasibility study may include an environmental impact report prepared pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) “Project” means any of the following:

(1) The construction of a conveyance facility, pumping facility, groundwater extraction facility, clear or ranney well, or facility for diversion from existing storage or conveyance facilities undertaken by a public agency for the diversion, storage, or distribution of water primarily for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreation, or fish and wildlife mitigation and enhancement purposes.

(2) Fish and wildlife mitigation and enhancement measures undertaken by a public agency, including the acquisition of lands which may be necessary for the mitigation of significant impact on fish and wildlife resources resulting from the implementation of a project undertaken pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) “Public agency” means any city, county, city and county, special district or other political subdivision of the state, including a joint powers entity created pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, in a county of the 22nd class or any county having a smaller population than a county of the 22nd class on the date on which this division becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.6.

The department shall carry out this article and shall give preference to projects undertaken to develop new water supplies and to mitigate significant environmental impacts resulting from those projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.8.

Applications for grants or loans for financial assistance under this article shall be made to the department in the form and with those supporting materials that are prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.10.

(a) The department may make grants to public agencies for feasibility studies.

(b) The amount of the grants may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.12.

(a) The department may make loans to public agencies for projects. Loans for a single project may not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(b) All loan applications shall include information relating to the public necessity of the project, the urgency of need, the engineering feasibility, the economic justification, and the financial feasibility of the project, as well as other information that the department may require.

(c) All loans made pursuant to this section are subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) Public agencies requesting a loan shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department, that an adequate opportunity for public participation regarding the loan has been provided.

(2) Any election held with respect to the loan shall include the voters of the entire agency except where the agency proposes to accept the loan on behalf of a specified portion, or portions, of the agency, in which case the election shall be held only in that portion or portions of the agency.

(3) Loan contracts may not provide for a moratorium on payment of principal or interest.

(4) Loans shall be for a period of up to 20 years. The interest rate for the loans shall be set at a rate of equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method. If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the contract’s repayment period. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and the interest on the loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.14.
